test/src/morphology/V-sibahama65_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - sibahama: # Verb (65) sibahama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     sibahama+V+Inf/mA: sibahama
     sibahama+V+Inf: sibadaq
     sibahama+V+ActPrtPrc: sibanuq
     sibahama+V+PssPrtPrc: sibat
     sibahama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: sibaha
     sibahama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: sibahas
     sibahama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: sibasi
     sibahama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: sibasi
